Tennessee, session 114, HB2590.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-727(b)(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(2) The failure of any member to attend three (3) consecutive meetings of the
committee. The presiding officer shall promptly notify, or cause to be notified, the
appointing authority of a member who fails to satisfy the attendance requirement as
prescribed in this subdivision (b)(2).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2590
012249
- 1 -